Utah statutes.
17-50-401.   Review of claims by county executive -- Auditor review --
Attorney review -- Claim requirements -- Approval or disapproval of claim --
Written explanation of claim process.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (3), each county executive shall review each claim
against the county and disapprove or, if payment appears to the county
executive to be just, lawful, and properly due and owing, approve the claim.
(2)  Upon receiving a notice of claim under Section 63G-7-401, the county
clerk shall deliver the notice of claim to the county executive.
(3) (a)  The county executive shall forward all claims regarding liability to
the county attorney, or, in a county that has a district attorney but not a
county attorney, to the district attorney for the attorney's review and
recommendation to the county executive regarding liability and payment.
(b)  Except as provided in Section 17-50-405, the county executive shall
forward all claims requesting payment for goods or services to the county
auditor for the auditor's review and recommendation to the county executive.
(4)  Each claim for goods or services against a county shall:
(a)  itemize the claim, giving applicable names, dates, and particular goods
provided or services rendered;
(b)  if the claim is for service of process, state the character of process
served, upon whom served, the number of days engaged, and the number of miles
traveled;
(c)  be duly substantiated as to its correctness and as to the fact that it is
justly due;
(d)  if the claim is for materials furnished, state to whom the materials were
furnished, by whom ordered, and the quantity and price agreed upon; and
(e)  be presented to the county executive within a year after the last item of
the account or credit accrued.
(5)  If the county executive refuses to hear or consider a claim because it is
not properly made out, the county executive shall cause notice of the refusal
to be given to the claimant or the claimant's agent and shall allow a
reasonable amount of time for the claim to be properly itemized and
substantiated.
(6)  Each county shall prepare and make available to a person submitting or
intending to submit a claim under this part a written explanation, in simple
and easy to understand language, of how to submit a claim to the county and of
the county's process for receiving, reviewing, and deciding a claim.
(7)  Nothing in this section may be construed to modify the requirements of
Section 63G-7-401.
